Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 3

County Officials Certificate Training Program Act

5-1-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “County Officials Certificate Training Program Act.”

Acts 1989, ch. 303, § 1.

5-1-302. Participants.

In the interpretation of this part, “participant” includes county sheriffs, trustees, state court clerks, county clerks, county mayors, registers of deeds, assessors of property, chief administrative officers of the county highway departments, county legislative body members, and the staff, employees, deputies and assistants to such officials who take courses under the county officials certificate training program (COCTP) as administered by the University of Tennessee institute for public service's center for government training.

Acts 1989, ch. 303, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-1-303. Creation.

There is hereby created a county officials certificate training program (COCTP) to be offered and administered by the University of Tennessee institute for public service's center for government training, with the assistance of the University of Tennessee institute for public service's county technical assistance service, and conducted in cooperation with the Tennessee County Services Association (TCSA), the County Officials Association of Tennessee (COAT), and the Tennessee Sheriffs' Association (TSA).

Acts 1989, ch. 303, § 3.

5-1-304. Levels of training — Credit hours — Curricula certification.

The county officials certificate training program (COCTP) shall be composed of three (3) levels of training: introductory, intermediate, and advanced.

At the successful completion of all three (3) levels, a participant shall have accumulated a minimum of one hundred fifteen (115) credit hours of instruction or related association involvement.

Curricula shall be offered for certification for the following county offices: county mayor, county legislative body member, county clerk, chief administrative officer of the county highway department, register of deeds, trustee, assessor of property, state court clerks and sheriff.

Acts 1989, ch. 303, § 4; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-1-305. Introductory level — Requirements.

For successful completion of the introductory level, thirty-six (36) credit hours of course work from the introductory level curricula, which may include up to eight (8) credits for association activities, within the county officials certificate training program (COCTP) must be completed by a participant.

The introductory level curricula shall be the same for all of the county offices included within the COCTP and shall be developed by the University of Tennessee institute for public service's center for government training.

Introductory level requirements shall include one (1) course on county budgeting and one (1) course on supervisory/management skills.

Upon successful completion of the introductory level, a participant will be awarded an introductory level certificate by the University of Tennessee institute for public service's center for government training.

Acts 1989, ch. 303, § 5.

5-1-306. Introductory level renewal sticker.

Participants who do not wish to enter the intermediate level or the advanced level or who cannot complete the requirements of the next level within one (1) year may complete eighteen (18) hours of training from courses not taken within the previous year and earn a renewal sticker to attach to the introductory level certificate.

Acts 1989, ch. 303, § 6.

5-1-307. Intermediate level — Requirements.

For successful completion of the intermediate level, fifty-one (51) credit hours of course work, including twenty-seven (27) credit hours for all officials and twenty-four (24) credit hours from the office specific courses developed for each of the county offices included in the county officials certificate training program (COCTP) must be completed by a participant.

All intermediate level courses will include a post test as part of the course work, which must be passed by the participant prior to receiving credit for the course work.

Participants who do not pass an intermediate level course shall repeat the course.

Intermediate level courses may be taken prior to introductory level courses.

Certificates will only be awarded by the University of Tennessee institute for public service's center for government training in the proper sequence.

Upon successful completion of the intermediate level, a participant will be awarded an intermediate level certificate by the University of Tennessee institute for public service's center for government training.

Acts 1989, ch. 303, § 7.

5-1-308. Advanced level — Requirements.

For successful completion of the advanced level, twenty-eight (28) credit hours of course work must be completed by a participant. Such course work shall include a fourteen-hour roundtable discussion of the intergovernmental issues affecting counties in particular and the way the management knowledge gained through the county officials certificate training program (COCTP) can be applied, as well as the participation in a real-life case study exercise to identify a specific problem/opportunity in the office discussing with other roundtable participants the manner in which the participant would address the problem or opportunity with skills learned in the COCTP.

At the end of the advanced level, participants who have successfully completed all three (3) levels will be designated “Certified Public Administrators”, in recognition of the significant time committed to their professional development, by the University of Tennessee institute for public service's center for government training.

Acts 1989, ch. 303, § 8.

5-1-309. Modification of course level requirements.

Modification of the course level requirements outlined in this part, including renewal criteria for any level, may be made by the University of Tennessee institute for public service's center for government training with the concurrence of a majority of the education committees of the associations referred to in § 5-1-303.

Acts 1989, ch. 303, § 9.

5-1-310. Certified public administrator — Educational incentive payments.

Any full-time county officer enumerated in § 8-24-102 who is designated as a “certified public administrator” pursuant to § 5-1-308 shall receive an annual educational incentive payment from the state treasurer in the amount of three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375), which amount shall be increased by a like amount each year until the official receiving such designation or continuing such designation shall receive an annual incentive amount of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

By no later than August 31 of each year, the University of Tennessee institute for public service's center for government training shall provide the state treasurer with a list of all county officers described in subsection (a) who have successfully completed all levels of the county officials certificate training program (COCTP) for that year. The list shall include the respective address of each such county officer and other information that the state treasurer may deem necessary.

The incentive provided for in subsection (a) shall continue to be paid each year to any such county officer; provided, that the officer is included in the list submitted under subsection (b) as having successfully completed the continuing education requirements of the program and all other requirements necessary to maintain the officer's designation as a certified public administrator.

The incentive provided for by this section shall be paid by the state treasurer from funds appropriated for that purpose. The incentive shall be paid no later than October 31 of each year.

The state treasurer shall offset the amount of any incentive payable to a county officer under this section against any other incentive or payment for professional training or development payable by the state to the officer so that the total amount paid to the officer by the state does not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500). The offset provided in this subsection (e) shall not be applicable to incentive compensation payable to assessors of property pursuant to § 67-1-508, and certified public administrator incentives payable to assessors shall be determined without regard to incentives payable under § 67-1-508.

Notwithstanding this section or any other law to the contrary, the availability or the amount of the incentive authorized by this section shall be subject to the appropriation of funds in each year's general appropriations act for the purposes set forth in this section. If, in any given year, the amount appropriated in that year's general appropriations act is not sufficient to pay each eligible county officer in full, then the amount available shall be prorated by the state treasurer among such officers. Any unpaid portion shall not be carried forward to subsequent years.

Any payment made pursuant to this section shall be considered as an incentive for the successful completion of educational training and shall not be considered in determining the county officer's average final compensation for retirement purposes pursuant to title 8, chapters 34-37. Further, the incentive payment shall not be used for the purpose of computing the salary or compensation of any other public official other than the officer receiving the incentive.

The incentive provided for by this section shall not be paid retroactively, but shall become effective for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1998.

Each county is encouraged and authorized to provide in its annual budget for payment of an annual educational incentive to employees as defined in § 29-20-102 who attain the designation of a “certified public administrator” pursuant to § 5-1-308 in an amount not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) less any payment received from the state as provided in subsection (a). The incentive provided by this section shall be paid from funds appropriated for such purpose and shall be paid in one (1) payment, no later than October 31. In any county providing such an incentive, the county mayor shall provide to the state treasurer the amount of any educational incentive paid in the county and the number of persons receiving such incentive, which the state treasurer shall compile in an annual report.

Acts 1998, ch. 941, § 1; 2001, ch. 405, § 8; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2005, ch. 204, §§ 5-7; 2007, ch. 184, § 1; 2007, ch. 473, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 941, § 2 provided that, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds required to implement the provisions of the act shall be expended from the general fund, and no funds allocated to the state treasurer shall be obligated for such implementation. It is the legislative intent that the funds of the state treasurer not be expended to implement the provisions of the act and that no appropriation to the state treasurer be reduced to offset such implementation costs.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.